Hawaii statutes.
§269-15.5 Appeals. An appeal from an
order of the public utilities commission under this chapter shall lie, subject
to chapter 602, in the manner provided for civil appeals from the circuit
courts. Only a person aggrieved in a contested case proceeding provided for in
this chapter may appeal from the order, if the order is final, or if
preliminary, is of the nature defined by section 91-14(a). The commission may
elect to be a party to all matters from which an order of the commission is
appealed, and the commission may file appropriate responsive briefs or
pleadings in the appeal; provided that where there was no adverse party in the
case below, or in cases where there is no adverse party to the appeal, the
commission shall be a party to all matters in which an order of the commission
is appealed and shall file the appropriate responsive briefs or pleadings in
defending all such orders. The appearance of the commission as a party in
appellate proceedings in no way limits the participation of persons otherwise
qualified to be parties on appeal. The appeal shall not of itself stay the
operation of the order appealed from, but the appellate court may stay the
order after a hearing upon a motion therefor and may impose conditions it deems
proper, including but not limited to requiring a bond, requiring that accounts
be kept, or requiring that other measures be taken as ordered to secure
restitution of the excess charges, if any, made during the pendency of the
appeal, in case the order appealed from is sustained, reversed, or modified in
whole or in part. [L 1998, c 195, §1; am L 2004, c 202, §28; am L 2006, c 94,
§1; am L 2010, c 109, §1]

Note

The source note to this section is supplemented by "am L
2006, c 94, §1; am L 2010, c 109, §1".

Rules of Court

Appeals, see Hawaii Rules of Appellate Procedure; stay
pending appeal, see HRAP rule 8.

Case Notes

Where a hearing on a petition for a declaratory order before
the public utilities commission was discretionary and not required by law, the
dismissal order was not a contested case under §91-1(5); therefore, because a
direct appeal to the intermediate appellate court (ICA) under §91-14(b) and
this section only applied to contested cases, appellant power company was not
entitled to appeal the dismissal order directly to the ICA; thus, the ICA
lacked jurisdiction over appellant's appeal. 126 H. 242 (App.), 269 P.3d 777
(2012).

Previous
Vol05_Ch0261-0319
Next